California, session 20252026, SB1173.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1159 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1159. The (a) A jury, or the a judge if a jury trial is waived, may find the a defendant guilty of any an offense, the commission of which is necessarily included in that with which he the defendant is charged, or of an attempt to commit the offense.(b) A jury, or a judge if a jury trial is waived, upon request of a defendant, may find the defendant guilty of a lesser offense, the commission of which is closely related to the offense with which the defendant is charged, if the court determines that all of the following conditions are met:(1) The defendant relies on a theory of defense that is consistent with a conviction for the lesser offense.(2) The evidence of the lesser offense is relevant to and admitted for the purpose of establishing whether the defendant is guilty of the charged offense.(3) A basis exists, other than an unexplainable rejection of prosecution evidence, on which the jury could find the offense to be less than that charged.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting subdivision (b) to restore the right of a defendant to receive jury instructions on lesser related offenses as originally guaranteed by the California Supreme Court in People v. Geiger (1984) 35 Cal.3d 510.SECTION 1.Section 93 of the Penal Code is amended to read:93.(a)Every judicial officer, juror, referee, arbitrator, or umpire, and every person authorized by law to hear or determine any question or controversy, who asks, receives, or agrees to receive, any bribe, upon any agreement or understanding that their vote, opinion, or decision upon any matters or question that is or may be brought before them for decision, shall be influenced thereby, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years and, if no bribe has been actually received, by a restitution fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, if a bribe was actually received, by a restitution fine of at least the actual amount of the bribe received or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, or any larger amount of not more than double the amount of any bribe received or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.(b)In imposing a restitution fine under this section, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay the fine.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________